Maryland, session 2025, HB1457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 11–103.4 of Article – Transportation of the Annotated Code of Maryland be
renumbered to be Section(s) 11–103.5.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Transportation
11–103.4.
“ALTERNATIVE FUEL VEHICLE” MEANS A MOTOR VEHICLE THAT:
(1) IS MANUFACTURED OR MODIFIED TO USE AN ALTERNATIVE FUEL,
INCLUDING ELECTRICITY, ETHANOL, METHANOL, GASOHOL, AND PROPANE OR
NATURAL GAS, REGARDLESS OF ENERGY CONSUMPTION; AND
(2) IS NOT A MOTOR FUEL VEHICLE, PLUG–IN ELECTRIC DRIVE
VEHICLE, OR PLUG–IN HYBRID VEHICLE.
11–125.2.
“FUEL–EFFICIENT VEHICLE” MEANS A MOTOR VEHICLE THAT HAS A
COMBINED FUEL ECONOMY RATING OF AT LEAST 25 MILES PER GALLON.
[13–956.
(a) In addition to the registration fee otherwise required by this title, the owner
of a motor vehicle shall pay an annual surcharge:
(1) On or before July 1, 2025, of:
(i) $125.00 for each zero–emission vehicle, as defined in § 23–206.4
of this article; and
(ii) $100.00 for each plug–in electric drive vehicle that is not a
zero–emission vehicle; and
(2) After June 30, 2025, at a rate based on the amounts established under
item (1) of this subsection adjusted for inflation as determined annually by the
Administration.
(b) The Administration shall allow for payment of a surcharge assessed under
this section:

HOUSE BILL 1457 3
(1) At the time the annual registration fee is paid; or
(2) In installments throughout the registration period, as determined by
the Administration.
(c) The proceeds collected from the surcharge assessed under subsection (a)(1) of
this section shall be deposited into the Transportation Trust Fund.
(d) If a person that owns a motor vehicle that is assessed the surcharge fails to
pay the surcharge or installments, the Administration shall refuse to register or renew or
transfer the registration of the motor vehicle.]
13–956.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) AN AUTOCYCLE, MOPED, OR MOTORCYCLE;
(2) A VEHICLE WITH A GROSS WEIGHT OVER 26,000 POUNDS;
(3) A VEHICLE THAT IS OWNED BY A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY;
(4) A VEHICLE THAT IS REGISTERED UNDER THE INTERNATIONAL
REGISTRATION PLAN; OR
(5) A VEHICLE THAT PARTICIPATES IN THE MILEAGE–BASED USER
FEE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 13–957 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE REGISTRATION FEE OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY
THIS TITLE, THE OWNER OF AN ALTERNATIVE FUEL VEHICLE, A FUEL–EFFICIENT
VEHICLE, OR A PLUG–IN ELECTRIC DRIVE VEHICLE SHALL PAY AN ANNUAL HIGHWAY
USE FEE FOR EACH MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTERED.
(C) THE HIGHWAY USE FEE SHALL BE:
(1) CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION;
(2) COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT AT THE TIME OF VEHICLE
REGISTRATION; AND
(3) DEPOSITED IN THE TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND.

HOUSE BILL 1457
(D) (1) (I) THE SECRETARY SHALL CALCULATE THE HIGHWAY USE FEE
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) FOR PURPOSES OF ESTIMATING THE AMOUNT OF MOTOR
FUEL TAXES PAID EACH YEAR TO OPERATE A FUEL–EFFICIENT VEHICLE UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL:
1. ESTIMATE THE AVERAGE NUMBER OF MILES A CLASS
A VEHICLE TRAVELS IN THE STATE EACH YEAR;
2. CALCULATE THE NUMBER OF GALLONS OF FUEL A
FUEL–EFFICIENT VEHICLE USES TO TRAVEL THE ESTIMATED NUMBER OF MILES
UNDER ITEM 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH; AND
3. APPLY THE MOTOR FUEL TAX RATE ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 9–305(A)(2) OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE AS INCREASED BY THE
COMPTROLLER UNDER §§ 9–305(B) AND 9–306 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(2) FOR A PLUG–IN ELECTRIC DRIVE VEHICLE, THE ANNUAL
HIGHWAY USE FEE IS EQUAL TO 85% OF THE ESTIMATED AMOUNT OF MOTOR FUEL
TAXES PAID EACH YEAR TO OPERATE A FUEL–EFFICIENT VEHICLE IN THE STATE.
(3) (I) FOR AN ALTERNATIVE FUEL VEHICLE OR A
FUEL–EFFICIENT VEHICLE, THE ANNUAL HIGHWAY USE FEE IS EQUAL TO 85% OF
THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN:
1. THE ESTIMATED AMOUNT OF MOTOR FUEL TAXES
PAID EACH YEAR TO OPERATE A FUEL–EFFICIENT VEHICLE IN THE STATE; AND
2. THE ESTIMATED AMOUNT OF MOTOR FUEL TAXES
PAID EACH YEAR TO OPERATE THE VEHICLE BEING REGISTERED IN THE STATE.
(II) 1. FOR THE PURPOSES OF ESTIMATING THE AMOUNT OF
MOTOR FUEL TAXES PAID TO OPERATE EACH VEHICLE BEING REGISTERED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I)2 OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE SECRETARY SHALL USE THE
COMBINED FUEL ECONOMY RATING FOR THE MOTOR VEHICLE AS DETERMINED BY
THE MANUFACTURER OF THE VEHICLE.
2. IF THE SECRETARY IS UNABLE TO DETERMINE THE
MANUFACTURER’S FUEL ECONOMY FOR THE VEHICLE, THE SECRETARY SHALL USE
THE FINAL ESTIMATE OF AVERAGE FUEL ECONOMY AS DETERMINED BY THE U.S.
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY, OF:

HOUSE BILL 1457 5
A. ALL CARS MANUFACTURED DURING THE SAME
MODEL YEAR AS THE VEHICLE;
B. IF THE VEHICLE HAS A GROSS WEIGHT OF AT LEAST
6,000 POUNDS BUT LESS THAN 26,000 POUNDS, ALL TRUCKS MANUFACTURED
DURING THE SAME MODEL YEAR; OR
C. IF DATA IS NOT AVAILABLE FOR THE MODEL YEAR OF
THE VEHICLE BEING REGISTERED, AVAILABLE DATA FOR THE MOST RECENT MODEL
YEAR CLOSEST TO THE MODEL YEAR OF THE VEHICLE BEING REGISTERED.
(E) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2025, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, THE
SECRETARY SHALL UPDATE THE HIGHWAY USE FEE CALCULATED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(F) IF THE VEHICLE IS REGISTERED FOR A PERIOD OTHER THAN 1 YEAR,
THE HIGHWAY USE FEE SHALL BE MULTIPLIED BY THE NUMBER OF YEARS OR
FRACTION OF YEARS THAT THE VEHICLE WILL BE REGISTERED.
(G) IF A PERSON THAT OWNS A MOTOR VEHICLE SUBJECT TO THE HIGHWAY
USE FEE FAILS TO PAY THE FEE, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL REFUSE TO REGISTER
OR RENEW OR TRANSFER THE REGISTRATION OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE.
13–957.
(A) (1) THERE IS A VOLUNTARY MILEAGE–BASED USER FEE PROGRAM
IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE MILEAGE–BASED USER FEE PROGRAM IS
TO ALLOW THE OWNER OF A VEHICLE SUBJECT TO THE HIGHWAY USE FEE
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 13–956 OF THIS SUBTITLE TO PAY A MILEAGE–BASED USER
FEE IN LIEU OF THE HIGHWAY USE FEE.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR THE
COLLECTION OF THE MILEAGE–BASED USER FEE ON AN ANNUAL BASIS.
(2) FROM THE AMOUNT OF THE MILEAGE–BASED USER FEE
COLLECTED EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL RETAIN AN AMOUNT NECESSARY
TO ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM AND DEPOSIT THE REMAINDER IN THE
TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 OF THE YEAR FOLLOWING THE YEAR THE
DEPARTMENT ESTABLISHES THE MILEAGE–BASED USER FEE PROGRAM, AND

HOUSE BILL 1457
EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CALCULATE THE
MILEAGE–BASED USER FEE FOR THE FISCAL YEAR AS PROVIDED IN THIS
SUBSECTION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CALCULATE A FEE PER MILE DRIVEN BY
DIVIDING THE HIGHWAY USE FEE UNDER § 13–956 OF THIS TITLE BY THE ESTIMATED
AVERAGE NUMBER OF MILES A CLASS A VEHICLE TRAVELS IN THE STATE EACH
YEAR.
(3) THE MILEAGE–BASED USER FEE IS EQUAL TO THE NUMBER OF
MILES A PARTICIPANT’S VEHICLE TRAVELS DURING THE FISCAL YEAR MULTIPLIED
BY THE FEE PER MILE DRIVEN CALCULATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(D) THE MILEAGE–BASED USER FEE PAID BY A MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER MAY
NOT EXCEED THE ANNUAL HIGHWAY USE FEE THAT THE OWNER WOULD HAVE
OTHERWISE PAID UNDER § 13–956 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH POLICIES AND PROCEDURES TO
ALLOW OWNERS OF VEHICLES SUBJECT TO THE HIGHWAY USE FEE THE OPTION OF
PARTICIPATING IN THE MILEAGE–BASED USER FEE PROGRAM WITH VEHICLE
LOCATION AND DATA TRACKING LIMITATIONS, INCLUDING:
(1) THE REQUIREMENT THAT ANY DATA COLLECTED BE USED ONLY
FOR ADMINISTRATION OF THE PROGRAM;
(2) THE EXCLUSION OF ANY INDIVIDUAL PARTICIPANT DATA FROM
DISCLOSURE;
(3) THE REQUIREMENT THAT PROGRAM DATA HAVE A SPECIFIC AND
LIMITED DATA RETENTION PERIOD; AND
(4) THE REQUIREMENT THAT ANY RESEARCH USING AGGREGATED
DATA BE SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF AN INSTITUTIONAL REVIEW BOARD.
(F) THE OWNER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTERED IN THE STATE MAY NOT
BE REQUIRED TO PARTICIPATE IN THE MILEAGE–BASED USER FEE PROGRAM.
(G) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A
FULLY OPERATIONAL MILEAGE–BASED USER FEE PROGRAM.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.